Illinois, session 104th, SB3490.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Policy. It is the declared policy of the State 5to conserve, protect, and encourage the development and 6improvement of its agricultural and forest lands and other 7facilities for the production of food, fiber, and other 8agricultural and silvicultural products. 9    Section 5. The Property Owned By Noncitizens Act is 10amended by changing Section 7 and by adding Sections 0.02, 9, 1110, 11, and 12 as follows: 12    (765 ILCS 60/0.02 new)13    Sec. 0.02. Definitions. As used in this Act:14    "Agricultural land" means any land in the State that is 15outside the corporate limits of a municipality and is: 16        (1) used for forestry production, including, but not 17    limited to, land exceeding 10 acres in which 10% of the 18    land is stocked by trees of any size, including land that 19    formerly had trees of any size covering the land that will 20    be naturally or artificially regenerated; or 21        (2) currently used for, or, if currently idle, land 22    last used within the past 5 years, for farming, ranching,   SB3490- 2 -LRB104 18790 JRC 32233 b1    or timber production, except land not exceeding 10 acres 2    in the aggregate, if the annual gross receipts from the 3    sale of the farm, ranch, or timber products produced on 4    the land do not exceed $1,000, including, but not limited 5    to, land used for activities described in the Standard 6    Industrial Classification Manual (1987), Division A, 7    exclusive of industry numbers 0711-0783, 0851, and 8    0912-0919, which cover animal trapping, game management, 9    hunting carried on as a business enterprise, trapping 10    carried on as a business enterprise, and wildlife 11    management. 12    "Agricultural land" does not include oil, gas, and all 13other minerals, including coal, lignite, brine, and all 14minerals known and recognized as commercial minerals 15underlying the land. 16    "Controlling interest" means an ownership interest of 50% 17or more, in the aggregate. 18    "Foreign government" means any government other than (i) 19the federal government or (ii) the government of a state or a 20political subdivision of a state. 21    "Interest in agricultural land" means the direct interest 22acquired, transferred, or held in agricultural land, 23including, but not limited to, a lease of agricultural land: 24        (1) for a term of one year or longer; or 25        (2) renewable by option for terms that, if the options 26    were all exercised, would total one year.   SB3490- 3 -LRB104 18790 JRC 32233 b1    "Party" means any individual, corporation, company, 2association, firm, partnership, society, joint-stock company, 3trust, estate, or any other legal entity. 4    "Prohibited foreign-party-controlled business" means a 5corporation, company, association, firm, partnership, society, 6joint-stock company, trust, estate, or other legal entity 7whose controlling interest is owned by a prohibited foreign 8party. 9    "Prohibited foreign party" means: 10        (1) a citizen or resident of a country subject to the 11    International Traffic in Arms Regulation, 22 CFR 120-130;12        (2) a foreign government formed within a country 13    subject to the International Traffic in Arms Regulation, 14    22 CFR 120-130; 15        (3) a party, other than an individual or a government, 16    created or organized under the laws of a foreign 17    government within a country subject to the International 18    Traffic in Arms Regulation, 22 CFR 120-130; 19        (4) any party, other than an individual or a 20    government:21            (A) that is created or organized under the laws of 22        any state; and 23            (B) in which a significant interest or substantial 24        control is directly or indirectly held or is capable 25        of being exercised by: 26                (i) an individual referred to in paragraph (1)   SB3490- 4 -LRB104 18790 JRC 32233 b1            of this definition; 2                (ii) a foreign government referred to in 3            paragraph (2) of this definition; 4                (iii) a party referred to in paragraph (3) of 5            this definition; or 6                (iv) a combination of the individuals, 7            parties, or governments referred to in this 8            subparagraph; 9        (5) an entity of particular concern designated by the 10    United States Department of State; or 11        (6) an agent, trustee, or other fiduciary of a person 12    or entity enumerated in paragraphs (1) through (5) of this 13    definition. 14    "Residence" means a person's principal dwelling place 15where the person intends to remain permanently for an 16indefinite period of time. 17    "Resident alien" means a person who: 18        (1) is not a citizen of the United States; and 19        (2) is a resident of a: 20            (A) state of the United States; 21            (B) territory of the United States; 22            (C) trusteeship of the United States; or 23            (D) protectorate of the United States. 24    "Significant interest" or "substantial control" means: 25        (1) an interest of 33% or more held by: 26            (A) a party referred to in paragraph (4) of the   SB3490- 5 -LRB104 18790 JRC 32233 b1        definition of "prohibited foreign party"; 2            (B) a party referred to in paragraph (1) of the 3        definition of "prohibited foreign party"; 4            (C) a party referred to in paragraph (3) of the 5        definition of "prohibited foreign party"; or 6            (D) a single government referred to in paragraph 7        (2) of the definition of "prohibited foreign party"; 8        (2) an interest of 33% or more held whenever the 9    parties, individuals, or governments referred to in 10    subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of this definition are 11    acting in concert with respect to the interest even though 12    no single individual, party, or government holds an 13    interest of 33% or more; or 14        (3) an interest of 50% or more, in the aggregate, held 15    by parties, individuals, or governments referred to in 16    subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of this definition even 17    though the individuals, parties, or foreign governments 18    may not be acting in concert.  19    (765 ILCS 60/7)  (from Ch. 6, par. 7)20    Sec. 7. Except as provided in Sections 9, 10, and 11, all 21All noncitizens may acquire, hold, and dispose of real and 22personal property in the same manner and to the same extent as 23natural born citizens of the United States, and the personal 24estate of a noncitizen dying intestate shall be distributed in 25the same manner as the estates of natural born citizens, and   SB3490- 6 -LRB104 18790 JRC 32233 b1all persons interested in such estate shall be entitled to 2proper distributive shares thereof under the laws of this 3state, whether they are noncitizens or not.4    This amendatory Act of 1992 does not apply to the 5Agricultural Foreign Investment Disclosure Act.6(Source: P.A. 102-1030, eff. 5-27-22.) 7    (765 ILCS 60/9 new)8    Sec. 9. Land ownership by prohibited 9foreign-party-controlled business prohibited. 10    (a) A prohibited foreign-party-controlled business may not 11acquire by grant, purchase, devise, descent, or otherwise any 12interest in public or private land in this State. A party may 13not hold public or private land as an agent, trustee, or other 14fiduciary for a prohibited foreign-party-controlled business 15in violation of this Section.16    (b) A prohibited foreign-party-controlled business entity 17in violation of this Section has 2 years to divest of the 18public or private land. If a prohibited 19foreign-party-controlled business entity does not divest the 20public or private land, the Attorney General shall commence an 21action in the circuit court within the jurisdiction of the 22public or private land. If the public or private land is held 23in violation of this Section, the circuit court shall order 24that the public or private land be sold through judicial 25foreclosure. Proceeds of the sale shall be disbursed to   SB3490- 7 -LRB104 18790 JRC 32233 b1lienholders, in the order of priority, except for liens that, 2under the terms of the sale, are to remain on the public or 3private land. The Attorney General shall promptly record a 4copy of the following in the local land records: 5        (1) upon commencement, notice of the pendency of an 6    action brought under this subsection; and7        (2) the order for the sale of the public or private 8    land under this subsection. 9    (c) A prohibited foreign-party-controlled business entity 10is, upon conviction for a violation of this Section, guilty of 11a Class 4 felony punishable by not more than 2 years' 12imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections 13or a $15,000 fine, or both. 14    (d) It is an affirmative defense to prosecution under this 15Section that a prohibited foreign-party-controlled business 16entity is a resident alien of the State. 17    (e) Title to public or private land is not invalid or 18subject to divestiture due to a violation of this Section by: 19        (1) any former owner; or20        (2) other person holding or owning a former interest 21    in the public or private land. 22    (f) A person who is not subject to this Section is not 23required to determine or inquire into whether another person 24is or may be subject to this Section.  25    (765 ILCS 60/10 new)  SB3490- 8 -LRB104 18790 JRC 32233 b1    Sec. 10. Foreign ownership of agricultural land. 2    (a) A prohibited foreign party may not acquire by grant, 3purchase, devise, descent, or otherwise any interest in 4agricultural land in this State regardless of whether the 5prohibited foreign party intends to use the agricultural land 6for nonfarming purposes. A party may not hold agricultural 7land as an agent, trustee, or other fiduciary for a prohibited 8foreign party in violation of this Section. 9    (b) A prohibited foreign party that acquires agricultural 10land in violation of this Section remains in violation as long 11as the prohibited foreign party holds an interest in the 12agricultural land.  13    (765 ILCS 60/11 new)14    Sec. 11. Interest in agricultural land owned by prohibited 15foreign parties; exceptions; penalties. 16    (a) A prohibited foreign party who is a resident alien of 17the United States has the right to acquire and hold 18agricultural land in the State upon the same terms as a citizen 19of the United States during the continuance of the prohibited 20foreign party's residence in the State.21    (b) If a prohibited foreign party is no longer a resident 22alien under subsection (a), the prohibited foreign party has 2 23years to divest of the agricultural land. If the prohibited 24foreign party does not divest of the agricultural land as 25required by this subsection, the Attorney General shall   SB3490- 9 -LRB104 18790 JRC 32233 b1commence an action in circuit court within the jurisdiction of 2the agricultural land. If the agricultural land is held in 3violation of this Section, the circuit court shall order that 4the agricultural land be sold through judicial foreclosure. 5    (c) If the Office of Agricultural Intelligence determines 6a prohibited foreign party has acquired agricultural land in 7this State in violation of this Section, the Office of 8Agricultural Intelligence shall report the violation to the 9Attorney General. Upon receiving notice under this subsection 10or upon receipt of information that leads the Attorney General 11to believe that a violation of this Section may exist, the 12Attorney General may issue subpoenas requiring the: 13        (1) appearance of witnesses; 14        (2) production of relevant records; and 15        (3) giving of relevant testimony. 16    If, as a result of the investigation under this 17subsection, the Attorney General concludes that a violation of 18this Section has occurred, the Attorney General shall commence 19an action in circuit court within the jurisdiction of the 20agricultural land. If the agricultural land is held in 21violation of this Section, the circuit court shall order that 22the agricultural land be sold through judicial foreclosure. 23    (d) The proceeds of a sale of agricultural land by 24judicial foreclosure authorized under this Section shall be 25disbursed to lienholders, in the order of priority, except for 26liens which under the terms of the sale are to remain on the   SB3490- 10 -LRB104 18790 JRC 32233 b1agricultural land. The Attorney General shall promptly record 2a copy of the following in the local land records: 3        (1) upon commencement, notice of the pendency of an 4    action under this Section; and5        (2) the order for the sale of agricultural land under 6    this Section. 7    (e) A prohibited foreign party owning agricultural land 8subsequent to the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 9104th General Assembly and not listed under an exception in 10subsection (a) or (b) is, upon conviction, guilty of a Class 4 11felony punishable by not more than 2 years' imprisonment in 12the custody of the Department of Corrections or a $15,000 13fine, or both. 14    (f) It is an affirmative defense to prosecution under this 15Section that a prohibited foreign party is a resident alien of 16the State. 17    (g) Title to agricultural land is not invalid or subject 18to divestiture due to a violation of this Section by: 19        (1) any former owner; or20        (2) other person holding or owning a former interest 21    in the agricultural land. 22    (h) A person who is not subject to this Section is not 23required to determine or inquire into whether another person 24is or may be subject to this Section.  25    (765 ILCS 60/12 new)  SB3490- 11 -LRB104 18790 JRC 32233 b1    Sec. 12. Office of Agricultural Intelligence. 2    (a) There is created within the Department of Agriculture 3the Office of Agricultural Intelligence.4    (b) The Office of Agricultural Intelligence is authorized 5and directed to: 6        (1) collect and analyze information concerning the 7    unlawful sale or possession of agricultural land by 8    prohibited foreign parties; and9        (2) administer and enforce the provisions of this Act, 10    including, but not limited to, the reporting of a 11    violation of this Act to the Attorney General under 12    subsection (c) of Section 11. 13    (c) The Director of Agriculture may designate employees of 14the Department of Agriculture who have the power of a peace 15officer or institutional law enforcement officer in the 16enforcement of criminal laws of this State to perform the 17duties of the Office of Agricultural Intelligence under 18subsection (b). 19    (d) The Office of Agricultural Intelligence shall operate 20under the direction of the Director of Agriculture.